Montana, session 2025, SB224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 1-1-216, MCA, is amended to read:
"1-1-216. Legal holidays and business days. (1) The following are legal holidays in the state of
Montana:
(a) Each Sunday;
(b) New Year's Day, January 1;
(c) Martin Luther King Jr. Day, the third Monday in January;
(d) Lincoln's and Washington's Birthdays Presidents' Day, the third Monday in February;
(e) Memorial Day, the last Monday in May;
(f) Independence Day, July 4;
(g) Labor Day, the first Monday in September;
(h) Indigenous Peoples' Day and Columbus Day, the second Monday in October;
(i) Veterans' Day, November 11;
(j) Thanksgiving Day, the fourth Thursday in November;
(k) Christmas Day, December 25;
(l) State general election day.
(2) (a) If any of the holidays in subsection (1)(b) through (1)(l) fall on a Sunday, the Monday
following is a holiday.
(b) If any of the holidays in subsection (1)(b) through (1)(l) fall on a Saturday, the Friday preceding
is a holiday.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 224
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 224
(c) All other days are business days."
Section 2. Notification to Montana supreme court. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this
act] to the Montana supreme court. The Montana supreme court is requested to update the definition of "legal
holiday" in its rules of civil procedure to reflect the provisions of [section 1].
Section 3. Notification to local governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to the Montana league of cities and towns and to the Montana association of counties.
Section 4. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 224
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 224, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 224
INTRODUCED BY S. MORIGEAU, D. BAUM, E. BOLDMAN, M. CAFERRO, B. CARTER, B. CLOSE, T.
CROWE, M. CUNNINGHAM, W. CURDY, S. DEMAROIS, M. DUNWELL, B. EDWARDS, J. ELLIS, D. FERN,
C. FITZPATRICK, P. FLOWERS, M. FOX, T. FRANCE, S. FYANT, A. GRIFFITH, D. HARVEY, D. HAWK, D.
HAYMAN, S. HOWELL, J. ISALY, J. KARLEN, E. KERR-CARPENTER, K. KORTUM, M. LEE, J. LYNCH, J.
MORIGEAU, L. MUSZKIEWICZ, S. NOVAK, A. OLSEN, D. POWERS, J. REAVIS, M. ROMANO, T. RUNNING
WOLF, J. SECKINGER, F. SMITH, L. SMITH, J. SOOKTIS, S. WEBBER, J. WINDY BOY, E. STAFMAN, P.
STRAND, K. SULLIVAN, M. THANE, P. TUSS
AN ACT ESTABLISHING INDIGENOUS PEOPLES' DAY AS A LEGAL HOLIDAY IN MONTANA; AND
AMENDING SECTION 1-1-216, MCA.